Hawaii statutes.
§183D-35 Importation; sale of game birds.
(a) Any responsible resident of good character who is a holder of the license
defined in section 183D-34 may bring within the State and have the custody of,
for the purpose of conducting a private and commercial shooting preserve,
domestication, propagation, or selling, as provided in this chapter, any game
bird, except those prohibited by section 150A-6.

(b) Any game bird brought within the State or
reared in captivity within the State may be sold or transported for
propagation, for food, or for other purposes, if tagged as provided in section
183D-36. [L 1985, c 174, pt of §4]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next